src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON	_N23

 ! non possessive forms

+N+Sg+Nom: K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:т K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ыт K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:н K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:ын K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:ныл K ;
+N+Sg+Instr:ыл K ;
+N+Sg+Trans:ыг K ;

+N+Du+Nom:ыг K ;
+N+Du+Loc:ыгт K ;
+N+Du+Lat:ыгн K ;
+N+Du+Abl:ыгныл K ;
+N+Du+Instr:ыгтыл K ;

+N+Pl+Nom:ыт K ;
+N+Pl+Loc:ытт K ;
+N+Pl+Lat:ытн K ;

+N+Pl+Lat:ытын K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:ытныл K ;
+N+Pl+Instr:ытыл K ;

 ! possessive forms

+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom:ум K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc:умт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat:умн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl:умныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr:умтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom:агум K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc:агумт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat:агумн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl:агумныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr:агумтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:анум K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc:анумт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat:анумн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl:анумныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr:анумтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom:ын K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc:ынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat:ынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl:ынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr:ынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom:агын K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc:агынт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat:агынн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl:агынныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr:агынтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ан K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:ант K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:анн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:анныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:антыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:анын K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:анынт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:анынн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:анынныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:анынтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom:е K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc:ет K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat:ен K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl:еныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr:етыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom:аге K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc:агет K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat:аген K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl:агеныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr:агетыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom:анэ K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc:анэт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat:анэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl:анэныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr:анэтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom:ме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc:ме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat:ме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl:ме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr:ме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom:агме̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc:агме̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat:агме̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl:агме̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr:агме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom:анме̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc:анме̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat:анме̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl:анме̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr:анме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom:ын K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc:ынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat:ынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl:ынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr:ынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom:агы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc:агы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat:агы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl:агы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr:агы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:аны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:аны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:аны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:аны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:аны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ан K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:ант K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:анн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:анныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:антыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom:е̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc:е̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat:е̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl:е̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr:е̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom:аге̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc:аге̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat:аге̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl:аге̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr:аге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom:анэ̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc:анэ̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat:анэ̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl:анэ̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr:анэ̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:ув K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc:увт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat:увн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl:увныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr:увтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom:агув K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc:агувт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat:агувн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl:агувныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr:агувтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom:анув K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc:анувт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat:анувн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl:анувныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr:анувтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom:ы̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc:ы̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat:ы̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl:ы̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr:ы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom:агы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc:агы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat:агы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl:агы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr:агы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:аны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:аны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:аны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:аны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:аны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ан K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:ант K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:анн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:анныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:антыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom:аныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc:анылт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat:анылн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl:анылныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr:анылтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom:ага̄ныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc:ага̄нылт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat:ага̄нылн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl:ага̄нылныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr:ага̄нылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:ананыл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:ананылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:ананылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:ананылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:ананылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:а̄ныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:а̄нылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:а̄нылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:а̄нылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:а̄нылтыл K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
