src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
а̄гм:а̄гм	_N23	"болезнь" ;
а̄гм:а̄гм	_N23	"болезнь" ;
а̄гм:а̄гм	_N23	"боль" ;
а̄гм:а̄гм	_N23	"боль" ;
а̄мп:а̄мп	_N23	"собака" ;
а̄мп:а̄мп	_N23	"собака" ;
а̄ӈкв:а̄ӈкв	_N23	"лосиха /старая/" ;
а̄пр:а̄пр	_N23	"прыть" ;
ащирм:ащирм	_N23	"холод" ;
банк:банк	_N23	"банк" ;
валм:валм	_N23	"мозг" ;
воск:воск	_N23	"воск" ;
героизм:героизм	_N23	"героизм" ;
грамм:грамм	_N23	"грамм" ;
залп:залп	_N23	"залп" ;
каӈк:каӈк	_N23	"двоюродный брат /по отцовской линии: стёрший по отношению к говорящему - сын дяди/" ;
каӈк:каӈк	_N23	"брат /старший/" ;
каӈк:каӈк	_N23	"брат /старший/" ;
каӈк:каӈк	_N23	"дядя /младший брат отца/" ;
каӈк:каӈк	_N23	"дядя /младший брат отца/" ;
капитализм:капитализм	_N23	"капитализм" ;
карп:карп	_N23	"карп" ;
ке̄лп:ке̄лп	_N23	"кровь" ;
ке̄лп:ке̄лп	_N23	"кровь" ;
ке̄лп:ке̄лп	_N23	"алый" ;
килограмм:килограмм	_N23	"килограмм" ;
километр:километр	_N23	"километр" ;
койп:койп	_N23	"бубен /шаманский/" ;
койп:койп	_N23	"барабан" ;
койп:койп	_N23	"барабан" ;
койп:койп	_N23	"бубен" ;
коммунизм:коммунизм	_N23	"коммунизм" ;
коммунизм:коммунизм	_N23	"коммунизм" ;
ле̄ӈк:ле̄ӈк	_N23	"гвоздь /деревянный/" ;
ле̄ӈк:ле̄ӈк	_N23	"гвоздь /деревянный/" ;
лё̄ӈх:лё̄ӈх	_N23	"след" ;
лё̄ӈх:лё̄ӈх	_N23	"дорога//путь" ;
литр:литр	_N23	"литр" ;
лозунг:лозунг	_N23	"лозунг /плакат с призывом/" ;
лозунг:лозунг	_N23	"лозунг /полит/ /обращение//призыв/" ;
лозунг:лозунг	_N23	"лозунг" ;
лэӈкв:лэӈкв	_N23	"пелёнка" ;
ма̄хв:ма̄хв	_N23	"обух" ;
мащк:мащк	_N23	"хвост /оленя/" ;
мащк:мащк	_N23	"хвост оленя" ;
ме̄тр:ме̄тр	_N23	"метр" ;
механизм:механизм	_N23	"механизм" ;
митинг:митинг	_N23	"митинг" ;
на̄ӈк:на̄ӈк	_N23	"лиственница" ;
на̄ӈк:на̄ӈк	_N23	"лиственница" ;
не̄лм:не̄лм	_N23	"язык /анат/" ;
нерв:нерв	_N23	"нерв" ;
организм:организм	_N23	"организм" ;
па̄йп:па̄йп	_N23	"кошель /берестяной/" ;
па̄йп:па̄йп	_N23	"берестяной кузов" ;
па̄йп:па̄йп	_N23	"берестяной кошель" ;
па̄ӈк:па̄ӈк	_N23	"сажа" ;
па̄ӈк:па̄ӈк	_N23	"грязь" ;
па̄ӈк:па̄ӈк	_N23	"грязь" ;
па̄ӈх:па̄ӈх	_N23	"мухомор" ;
па̄ӈх:па̄ӈх	_N23	"мухомор" ;
па̄рк:па̄рк	_N23	"парк /место стоянки и ремонта машин/" ;
па̄рк:па̄рк	_N23	"парк /место отдыха/" ;
патриотизм:патриотизм	_N23	"патриотизм" ;
полк:полк	_N23	"полк" ;
порх:порх	_N23	"корешок /о растении/" ;
по̄рх:по̄рх	_N23	"корпус" ;
прииск:прииск	_N23	"прииск" ;
пропуск:пропуск	_N23	"пропуск /документ/" ;
пулп:пулп	_N23	"пробка" ;
пуӈк:пуӈк	_N23	"голова" ;
пуӈк:пуӈк	_N23	"голова" ;
пуӈк:пуӈк	_N23	"зуб / зубной" ;
са̄лм:са̄лм	_N23	"полоса /удлинённый кусок чего-л//линия//черта/" ;
са̄нспуӈк:са̄нспуӈк	_N23	"колено" ;
са̄нспуӈк:са̄нспуӈк	_N23	"коленная чашечка /анат/" ;
сантиметр:сантиметр	_N23	"сантиметр" ;
саӈкв:саӈкв	_N23	"клин" ;
са̄рп:са̄рп	_N23	"шарф" ;
са̄рп:са̄рп	_N23	"шарф" ;
серп:серп	_N23	"серп" ;
соӈиализм:соӈиализм	_N23	"социализм" ;
сэ̄ӈкв:сэ̄ӈкв	_N23	"гнев" ;
сэ̄ӈкв:сэ̄ӈкв	_N23	"пар//туман" ;
сэ̄ӈкв:сэ̄ӈкв	_N23	"туман" ;
тальх:тальх	_N23	"остриё" ;
тальх:тальх	_N23	"верхушка" ;
танк:танк	_N23	"танк" ;
та̄ӈх:та̄ӈх	_N23	"плавник /рыбы/" ;
театр:театр	_N23	"театр" ;
тигр:тигр	_N23	"тигр" ;
томп:томп	_N23	"губа /оленя/" ;
томп:томп	_N23	"губа /оленя//лошади/" ;
тоӈх:тоӈх	_N23	"копыто" ;
тумп:тумп	_N23	"остров" ;
тумп:тумп	_N23	"остров" ;
фильм:фильм	_N23	"фильм" ;
хирург:хирург	_N23	"хирург" ;
хӯлп:хӯлп	_N23	"сетка//сеть /рыболовная/" ;
хӯльм:хӯльм	_N23	"пепел" ;
хумп:хумп	_N23	"волна" ;
хумп:хумп	_N23	"волна" ;
цирк:цирк	_N23	"цирк" ;
четверг:четверг	_N23	"четверг" ;
штурм:штурм	_N23	"штурм" ;
щаӈкв:щаӈкв	_N23	"выпуклость" ;
щаӈкв:щаӈкв	_N23	"возвышенность" ;
ще̄ӈкв:ще̄ӈкв	_N23	"пар /водяной/" ;
э̄ӈк:э̄ӈк	_N23	"племянница /дочь сестры/" ;
э̄ӈк:э̄ӈк	_N23	"двоюродная сестра /дочь тётки/" ;
я̄ӈк:я̄ӈк	_N23	"лёд" ;
я̄ӈк:я̄ӈк	_N23	"лёд" ;
